Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1418
Landlord to supply possession of dwelling unit.

At the commencement of the term the landlord shall deliver possession of the premises to the tenant in compliance with the rental agreement and section 76-1419. The landlord may bring an action for possession against any person wrongfully in possession and may recover the damages provided in subsection (3) of section 76-1437. If the landlord makes reasonable efforts to obtain possession of the premises, he shall not be liable for an action under this section.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 18.

A tenant who accepts possession and lives on the property for several months thereafter does not have a claim under this section, because the duties described in this section pertain to the "commencement" of the lease term. Vasquez v. CHI Properties, 302 Neb. 742, 925 N.W.2d 304 (2019).